Florida, session 2026, SB1698.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 112.044, Florida 19 Statutes, is amended to read: 20 112.044âPublic employers, employment agencies, labor 21 organizations; discrimination based on age prohibited; 22 exceptions; remedy.â 23 (5)âNOTICE TO BE POSTED.âEach employer, employment agency, 24 and labor organization shall post and keep posted in conspicuous 25 places upon its premises, or on the Internet in a manner that is 26 accessible to its employees or members, notices required by the 27 United States Department of Labor and the Equal Employment 28 Opportunity Commission. 29 Section 2.âSection 440.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to 30 read: 31 440.055âNotice requirements.âAn employer who employs fewer 32 than four employees, who is permitted by law to elect not to 33 secure payment of compensation under this chapter, and who 34 elects not to do so must shall post clear written notice in a 35 conspicuous location at each worksite directed to all employees 36 and other persons performing services at the worksite, or on the 37 Internet in a manner that is accessible to his or her employees, 38 of their lack of entitlement to benefits under this chapter. 39 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 40 443.151, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 41 443.151âProcedure concerning claims.â 42 (1)âPOSTING OF INFORMATION.â 43 (a)âEach employer shall must post and maintain in places 44 readily accessible to individuals in her or his employ printed 45 statements concerning benefit rights, claims for benefits, and 46 other matters relating to the administration of this chapter as 47 the Department of Commerce may by rule prescribe. Each employer 48 shall: 49 1.âmust Supply to individuals copies of printed statements 50 or other materials relating to claims for benefits as directed 51 by the rules of the department. The department shall supply 52 these printed statements and other materials to each employer 53 without cost to the employer; or 54 2.âPost copies of such statements on the Internet in a 55 manner that is accessible to her or his employees. 56 Section 4.âSubsection (2) of section 448.109, Florida 57 Statutes, is amended to read: 58 448.109âNotification of the state minimum wage.â 59 (2)âEach employer who must pay an employee the Florida 60 minimum wage must: 61 (a)âshall Prominently display a poster substantially 62 similar to the one made available pursuant to subsection (3) in 63 a conspicuous and accessible place in each establishment where 64 such employees are employed; or 65 (b)âPost a copy of such poster on the Internet in a manner 66 that is accessible to his or her employees. 67 Section 5.âSubsection (2) of section 450.045, Florida 68 Statutes, is amended to read: 69 450.045âProof of identity and age; posting of notices.â 70 (2)âAny person who hires, employs, or suffers to work any 71 minor must: 72 (a)âshall Post at a conspicuous place on the property or 73 place of employment, where it may be easily read, a poster 74 notifying minors of the Child Labor Law, to be provided by the 75 division upon request; or 76 (b)âPost a copy of such poster on the Internet in a manner 77 that is accessible to his or her employees. 78 Section 6.âSubsection (11) of section 760.10, Florida 79 Statutes, is amended to read: 80 760.10âUnlawful employment practices.â 81 (11)âEach employer, employment agency, and labor 82 organization shall post and keep posted in conspicuous places 83 upon its premises, or on the Internet in a manner that is 84 accessible to its employees or members, a notice provided by the 85 commission setting forth such information as the commission 86 deems appropriate to effectuate the purposes of ss. 760.01 87 760.10. 88 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 89 made by this act to section 440.055, Florida Statutes, in a 90 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 440.185, Florida 91 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 92 440.185âNotice of injury or death; reports; penalties for 93 violations.â 94 (1)âAn employee who suffers an injury arising out of and in 95 the course of employment shall advise his or her employer of the 96 injury within 30 days after the date of or initial manifestation 97 of the injury. Failure to so advise the employer shall bar a 98 petition under this chapter unless: 99 (a)âThe employer or the employerâs agent had actual 100 knowledge of the injury; 101 (b)âThe cause of the injury could not be identified without 102 a medical opinion and the employee advised the employer within 103 30 days after obtaining a medical opinion indicating that the 104 injury arose out of and in the course of employment; 105 (c)âThe employer did not put its employees on notice of the 106 requirements of this section by posting notice pursuant to s. 107 440.055; or 108 (d)âExceptional circumstances, outside the scope of 109 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b) justify such failure. 110 111 In the event of death arising out of and in the course of 112 employment, the requirements of this subsection shall be 113 satisfied by the employeeâs agent or estate. Documents prepared 114 by counsel in connection with litigation, including but not 115 limited to notices of appearance, petitions, motions, or 116 complaints, shall not constitute notice for purposes of this 117 section. 118 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 119 made by this act to section 440.055, Florida Statutes, in a 120 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 440.19, Florida 121 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 122 440.19âTime bars to filing petitions for benefits.â 123 (4)âNotwithstanding the provisions of this section, the 124 failure to file a petition for benefits within the periods 125 prescribed is not a bar to the employeeâs claim unless the 126 carrier advances the defense of a statute of limitations in its 127 initial response to the petition for benefits. If a claimant 128 contends that an employer or its carrier is estopped from 129 raising a statute of limitations defense and the carrier 130 demonstrates that it has provided notice to the employee in 131 accordance with s. 440.185 and that the employer has posted 132 notice in accordance with s. 440.055, the employee must 133 demonstrate estoppel by clear and convincing evidence. 134 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.